apertium-kir.kir@Cyrl-kir@Latn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%{й%}
%{☭%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
!Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
!Punct ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
и:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
И:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
у:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
У:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ү:ү AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ү:ү AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
а:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
А:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
э:э AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Э:э AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

е:%{й%}е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;  ! {й} as ي only after vowels
Е:%{й%}е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;  ! {й} as ي only after vowels

ю:йу AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ю:йу AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
я:йа AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Я:йа AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:йо AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ё:йо AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 


о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ө:ө AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ө:ө AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 


б:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Б:Б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
в:в AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
В:В AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
г:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Г:Г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
д:д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Д:Д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ж:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ж:Ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
з:з AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
З:З AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
й:й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Й:Й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
к:к AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
К:К AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
л:л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Л:Л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
м:м AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
М:М AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
н:н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Н:Н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ң:ң AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ң:Ң AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
п:п AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
П:П AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
р:р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Р:Р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
с:с AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
С:С AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
т:т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Т:Т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ф:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ф:Ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
х:х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Х:Х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ч:ч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ч:Ч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ш:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ш:Ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ъ:ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ъ:Ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ь:ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
Ь:Ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ц:тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words
Ц:Тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words
щ:щ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words?
Щ:Щ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; ! For Russian words?


LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
